Washington statutes.
RCW 12.40.120

Appeals—Setting aside judgments.

No appeal shall be permitted from a judgment of the small claims department of the district court where the amount claimed was less than two hundred fifty dollars. No appeal shall be permitted by a party who requested the exercise of jurisdiction by the small claims department where the amount claimed by that party was less than one thousand dollars. A party in default may seek to have the default judgment set aside according to the civil court rules applicable to setting aside judgments in district court.

[ 2019 c 251 s 6; 1997 c 352 s 4; 1988 c 85 s 2; 1984 c 258 s 69; 1970 ex.s. c 83 s 4.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.